Tennessee statutes. Title 11 Natural Areas and Recreation
Chapter 23

Acquisition of Lands by Political Subdivisions for Forestry Purposes

11-23-101. Counties, municipalities or other political subdivisions authorized to acquire lands for forestry purposes.

Counties, municipalities or other political subdivisions of the state are authorized to acquire by purchase, gift or otherwise lands within the boundaries of the state and to use the same for forestry purposes.

Acts 1941, ch. 105, § 1; C. Supp. 1950, § 630.28 (Williams, § 630.28a); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 11-701.

11-23-102. Appropriation or bond issue — Public notice.

The governing body of the county, municipality or other political subdivision of the state may appropriate money or issue bonds pursuant to title 9, chapter 21, for the purchase of lands for the purposes herein provided, to establish forest plantations or for the care and management of forests. Such governing body may undertake such work at regular or special meetings by a majority vote of such body after two (2) weeks' public notice setting forth the fact that such plan is contemplated and that moneys are to be appropriated for such purpose.

Acts 1941, ch. 105, § 2; C. Supp. 1950, § 630.29 (Williams, § 630.25b); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 11-702; Acts 1988, ch. 750, § 46.

Cross-References. Expenditures authorized, §§ 11-3-106, 11-4-404.

11-23-103. Rules and provisions for administration and maintenance.

Upon the acquisition of any forests or of lands suitable for such under this chapter, the governing body shall notify the state forester who shall make such rules for the government and proper administration of the same as may be necessary. The governing body shall thereupon publish such rules, declare the uses of the forest in accord with the true intent hereof and make such provisions for its administration, maintenance, protection and development as shall be necessary or expedient.

Acts 1941, ch. 105, § 3; C. Supp. 1950, § 630.30 (Williams, § 630.25c); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 11-703.

11-23-104. Operation and maintenance for benefit of inhabitants.

Such governing body has the full power and authority to acquire, maintain, manage and operate such forest for the benefit of the inhabitants of the county, municipality or other political subdivision under such technical supervision as the state forester may prescribe and in accordance with § 11-23-103.

Acts 1941, ch. 105, § 4; C. Supp. 1950, § 630.31 (Williams, § 630.25d); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 11-704.

11-23-105. Net income paid into general fund.

The net income from such lands shall be paid into the general fund of such county, municipality or political subdivision and shall be used only upon order of its governing body.

Acts 1941, ch. 105, § 5; C. Supp. 1950, § 630.32 (Williams, § 630.25e); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 11-705.